Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1495.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 4-301, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-301. Liability limitation; social host A person other than a licensee or an employee of a licensee acting during the employee's working hours or in connection with such employment is not liable in damages to any person who is injured, or to the survivors of any person killed, or for damage to property, which is alleged to have been caused in whole or in part by reason of the furnishing or serving of spirituous liquor to a person of at least the legal drinking age. END_STATUTE